Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-601
Act, how cited.

Sections 38-601 to 38-618 shall be known and may be cited as the Certified Nurse Midwifery Practice Act.

Laws 1984, LB 761, § 1;

Laws 2005, LB 256, § 82;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-1738;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 213.